Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3616
Rules; promulgation; judicial review.

(a) The interstate commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively and efficiently achieve the purposes of the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the interstate commission exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope of the purposes of the compact, or the powers granted hereunder, then such an action by the interstate commission shall be invalid and have no force or effect.

(b) Rules deemed appropriate for the operations of the interstate commission shall be made pursuant to a rulemaking process that substantially conforms to the Revised Model State Administrative Procedure Act of 2010 and subsequent amendments thereto.

(c) Not later than thirty days after a rule is promulgated, any person may file a petition for judicial review of the rule in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the interstate commission has its principal offices. The filing of such a petition shall not stay or otherwise prevent the rule from becoming effective unless the court finds that the petitioner has a substantial likelihood of success. The court shall give deference to the actions of the interstate commission consistent with applicable law and shall not find the rule to be unlawful if the rule represents a reasonable exercise of the authority granted to the interstate commission.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 16.